Missouri, session 2026, HB3311.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 168.770, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 168.770 and 168.771, to read as follows:
168.770. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "School librarian", a teacher who holds a certificate of license to teach under
section 168.021 and is certified as a library media specialist by the department of elementary
and secondary education;
(2) "School library information and technology program", a school-based program
that is staffed by a school librarian and that:
(a) Provides a broad, flexible array of services, resources, and instruction that support
student mastery of the essential academic learning requirements and state standards in all
subject areas;
(b) Promotes the freedom to read;
(c) Respects the identity of students;
(d) Provides opportunities for students to read and learn independently; and
(e) Supports the implementation of any school improvement plan of the district;
(3) "Standards", the most current version of the Missouri school library
program standards approved by the Missouri Association of School Librarians to
promote effective school library programs and that shall be adopted by a school district.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3311 2
2. Before July 1, 2019, the department of elementary and secondary education shall
develop a process for recognition of a district's school library information and technology
program.
3. The department of elementary and secondary education may promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined
in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable, and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2018,
shall be invalid and void.
168.771. 1. The school board of each school district shall adopt a collection
development and maintenance policy, a library program and display policy, and a
library material review and reconsideration policy ensuring that all library resources
are evaluated and made accessible in accordance with the following standards:
(1) That the library resources are in compliance with the First Amendment of
the Constitution of the United States as set forth in Board of Education, Island Trees
Union Free School District No. 26 v. Pico, 457 U.S. 853 (1982), and Article I, Section 8 of
the Constitution of Missouri concerning the freedom of speech;
(2) That school libraries are places for voluntary inquiry and the dissemination
of information and ideas;
(3) That there are protections against harassment and discrimination including,
but not limited to, discrimination based on race, color, sex, gender identity, religion,
national origin, sexual orientation, or disability; and
(4) That there is support for academic standards including, but not limited to,
the Missouri learning standards and the most current Missouri school library program
standards approved by the Missouri Association of School Librarians to promote
effective school library programs.
2. (1) Except as otherwise provided, a school board of each school district may
remove a library resource from its permanent collection only if the library resource has
been reviewed in accordance with an established policy for the reconsideration and the
school district:
(a) Acknowledges that the school library is intended to promote free expression
and free access to ideas by students, and censorship of library and other educational
material is not in the general interest of students;

HB 3311 3
(b) Proscribes library resources from being removed from the school library for
doctrinal or partisan reasons, or because of the origin, background, or viewpoints
expressed by the author;
(c) Allows a complaint regarding library resources to be made only by a student,
staff member, or parent or guardian of a student of the particular school;
(d) Requires that any challenged library resource remains within the school
library and be available for a student to reserve, check out, or access until there is a final
decision reached by the review committee;
(e) Requires a review committee, which includes at a minimum, one principal at
the appropriate grade level, one librarian or media specialist, one classroom teacher, the
department head in the subject area of the challenged material, and one community
member, to:
a. Evaluate the request for reconsideration and removal;
b. Read the challenged library resource in its entirety; and
c. Make a recommendation on whether to remove the resource within sixty
school days from the date of receiving the request;
(f) Prescribes that the complainant may appeal the review committee's decision
to the school board of a school district. The school board shall provide a written
statement of reasons for the removal or nonremoval of a library resource and any final
determination that is contrary to the recommendations of the review committee; and
(g) Allows that once a decision has been made by the review committee, the
library resource cannot be subject to a new review for a period of four years.
(2) Displays and programs shall not be limited, proscribed, or censored for
doctrinal or partisan reasons or because of the origin, background, or viewpoints
expressed.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law, a written request for reconsideration
of a library resource is not considered student data as described in section 161.096 and is
subject to public scrutiny.
3. Nothing in this section precludes any person responsible for school library
content from removing resources that have become outdated or to accommodate new
materials, provided that the decision is not made based on personal, political, or
doctrinal views.
4. No school library staff member shall be subject to termination, demotion,
discipline, or retaliation for refusing to remove a library resource before it has been
reviewed in accordance with the applicable school board's policy for the reconsideration

HB 3311 4
of library resources or for making displays, acquisitions, or programming decisions that
are made in good faith and in accordance with the standards under this section.
✔